Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1183.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 204 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 204. Exclusions from Tax.--The tax imposed by section 202 shall not be imposed upon any of the following:* * *(77) Fees charged by a nonprofit corporation for the adoption of a pet that meets all of the following:(i) The nonprofit corporation is a releasing agency, as 12345678910111213141516171819202122 defined in section 901-A of the act of December 7, 1982 (P.L.784, No.225), known as the "Dog Law."(ii) The nonprofit corporation does not collect fees charged for the adoption of an animal that exceed the expenses incurred by the nonprofit corporation for the care provided to the animal.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1183PN1324 - 2 - 1234567